algorithms/tamil/stem_Unicode.sbl
/*
* Affix stripping stemming algorithm for Tamil
* By Damodharan Rajalingam
*/

stringescapes {}

/* Aytham */
stringdef aytham hex '0B83'

/* Uyir - independent vowels */
stringdef a hex '0B85'
stringdef aa hex '0B86'
stringdef i hex '0B87'
stringdef ii hex '0B88'
stringdef u hex '0B89'
stringdef uu hex '0B8A'
stringdef e hex '0B8E'
stringdef ee hex '0B8F'
stringdef ai hex '0B90'
stringdef o hex '0B92'
stringdef oo hex '0B93'
stringdef au hex '0B94'

/* Consonants */
stringdef ka hex '0B95'
stringdef nga hex '0B99'
stringdef ca hex '0B9A'
stringdef ja hex '0B9C'
stringdef nya hex '0B9E'
stringdef tta hex '0B9F'
stringdef nna hex '0BA3'
stringdef ta hex '0BA4'
stringdef tha hex '0BA4'
stringdef na hex '0BA8'
stringdef nnna hex '0BA9'
stringdef pa hex '0BAA'
stringdef ma hex '0BAE'
stringdef ya hex '0BAF'
stringdef ra hex '0BB0'
stringdef rra hex '0BB1'
stringdef la hex '0BB2'
stringdef lla hex '0BB3'
stringdef llla hex '0BB4'
stringdef zha hex '0BB4'
stringdef va hex '0BB5'

/* Vatamozi - borrowed */
stringdef sha hex '0BB6'
stringdef ssa hex '0BB7'
stringdef sa hex '0BB8'
stringdef ha hex '0BB9'


/* Dependent vowel signs (kombu etc.) */
stringdef vs_aa hex '0BBE'
stringdef vs_i hex '0BBF'
stringdef vs_ii hex '0BC0'
stringdef vs_u hex '0BC1'
stringdef vs_uu hex '0BC2'
stringdef vs_e hex '0BC6'
stringdef vs_ee hex '0BC7'
stringdef vs_ai hex '0BC8'
stringdef vs_o hex '0BCA'
stringdef vs_oo hex '0BCB'
stringdef vs_au hex '0BCC'

/* Pulli */
stringdef pulli hex '0BCD'

/* AU length markk */
stringdef au_lmark hex '0BD7'


routines (
 remove_plural_suffix
 remove_question_suffixes
 remove_question_prefixes
 remove_pronoun_prefixes
 remove_command_suffixes
 remove_um
 remove_vetrumai_urupukal
 fix_va_start
 fix_ending
 fix_endings
 remove_tense_suffix
 remove_tense_suffixes
 remove_common_word_endings
 strlen
 has_min_length
)

externals ( stem )

/*
groupings (
 suttezhuthu
 q_suffixes
 q_prefixes
 word_starter
 vallinam
 mellinam
 itaiyinam
 uyir
 vowel_signs
)
*/

booleans (
 found_a_match
 found_vetrumai_urupu
 found_wrong_ending
)

integers (
 length
)

/*
define q_suffixes '{vs_aa}{vs_oo}{vs_ee}'
define q_prefixes '{e}' 
define word_starter '{ka}{ca}{tha}{va}{na}{pa}{ma}{ya}{nga}{nya}'
define suttezhuthu '{a}{i}{u}'
define vallinam '{ka}{ca}{tta}{tha}{pa}{rra}'
define mellinam '{nga}{nya}{nna}{na}{ma}{nnna}'
define itaiyinam '{ya}{ra}{la}{va}{zha}{lla}'
define vowel_signs '{vs_aa}{vs_i}{vs_ii}{vs_e}{vs_ee}{vs_u}{vs_uu}{vs_ai}'
define uyir '{a}{aa}{i}{ii}{u}{uu}{e}{ee}{ai}{o}{oo}{au}'
*/

define strlen as (
 // size in snowball returns bytes which is not very useful for utf8
 // this routine gives the number of characters
 $length = 0
 do repeat (next ($length = length+1))
)

define has_min_length as (
 strlen
 $length > 4
)

define fix_va_start as (
 (try '{va}{vs_oo}' and [ '{va}{vs_oo}' ] <- '{oo}' ) or
 (try '{va}{vs_o}' and [ '{va}{vs_o}' ] <- '{o}' ) or
 (try '{va}{vs_u}' and [ '{va}{vs_u}' ] <- '{u}' ) or
 (try '{va}{vs_uu}' and [ '{va}{vs_uu}' ] <- '{uu}' )
)

define fix_endings as (
 set found_wrong_ending
 repeat (found_wrong_ending (do fix_ending))
)

define remove_question_prefixes as (
 [ ('{e}' ) among('{ka}' '{ca}' '{tha}' '{va}' '{na}' '{pa}' '{ma}' '{ya}' '{nga}' '{nya}') '{pulli}' ] delete
 do fix_va_start
)

define fix_ending as (
 unset found_wrong_ending
 strlen
 $length > 3
 backwards (
  ( [among('{na}{pulli}' '{na}{pulli}{ta}' '{na}{pulli}{ta}{pulli}') ] delete )
  or
  ( ['{ya}{pulli}' test among('{vs_ai}' '{vs_i}' '{vs_ii}') ] delete )
  or
  ( [ '{tta}{pulli}{pa}{pulli}' or '{tta}{pulli}{ka}{pulli}' ] <- '{lla}{pulli}' )
  or
  ( [ '{nnna}{pulli}{rra}{pulli}' ] <- '{la}{pulli}' )
  or
//		( [ '{rra}{pulli}{ka}{pulli}'  or '{nnna}{pulli}{nnna}{pulli}' ] <- '{la}{pulli}'  )
  ( [ '{rra}{pulli}{ka}{pulli}' ] <- '{la}{pulli}' )
  or
  ( [ '{tta}{pulli}{tta}{pulli}' ] <- '{tta}{vs_u}' )
  or
  ( found_vetrumai_urupu [ '{ta}{pulli}{ta}{pulli}' (test not '{vs_ai}') ] <- '{ma}{pulli}' ] )
  or
  ( [ '{vs_u}{ka}{pulli}' or '{vs_u}{ka}{pulli}{ka}{pulli}' ] <- '{pulli}' )
  or
  ( [ '{pulli}' among('{ka}' '{ca}' '{tta}' '{tha}' '{pa}' '{rra}') '{pulli}' among('{ka}' '{ca}' '{tta}' '{tha}' '{pa}' '{rra}') ] delete )
  or
  ( [ '{vs_u}{ka}{pulli}' ] <- '{pulli}' )
  or
  ( [ '{pulli}' among('{ka}' '{ca}' '{tta}' '{tha}' '{pa}' '{rra}') ] delete )
  or
  ( [ '{pulli}' (among('{ya}' '{ra}' '{la}' '{va}' '{zha}' '{lla}') or among('{nga}' '{nya}' '{nna}' '{na}' '{ma}' '{nnna}')) '{pulli}' ] <- '{pulli}' )
  or
  ( [ among('{va}' '{ya}' '{va}{pulli}') ] delete )
  or
  ( [ '{nnna}{vs_u}' (test not among('{vs_aa}' '{vs_i}' '{vs_ii}' '{vs_e}' '{vs_ee}' '{vs_u}' '{vs_uu}' '{vs_ai}')) ] delete )
  or
  ( [ '{nga}{pulli}' (test not '{vs_ai}')] <- '{ma}{pulli}' )
  or
  ( [ '{nga}{pulli}' ] delete )
  or
  ( [ '{pulli}' (test (among('{vs_aa}' '{vs_i}' '{vs_ii}' '{vs_e}' '{vs_ee}' '{vs_u}' '{vs_uu}' '{vs_ai}') or '{pulli}')) ] delete )
  )

 set found_wrong_ending // If any of above test pass set the flag
)

define remove_pronoun_prefixes as (
 unset found_a_match
 [ among('{a}' '{i}' '{u}') among('{ka}' '{ca}' '{tha}' '{va}' '{na}' '{pa}' '{ma}' '{ya}' '{nga}' '{nya}') '{pulli}' ] delete
 (set found_a_match)
 do fix_va_start
)

define remove_plural_suffix as (
 unset found_a_match
 backwards (
  ( [ '{vs_u}{nga}{pulli}{ka}{lla}{pulli}' (test not among('{ka}' '{ca}' '{tta}' '{tha}' '{pa}' '{rra}')) ] <- '{pulli}' ) or
  ( [ '{rra}{pulli}{ka}{lla}{pulli}' ] <- '{la}{pulli}' ) or
  ( [ '{tta}{pulli}{ka}{lla}{pulli}' ] <- '{lla}{pulli}' ) or
  ( [ '{ka}{lla}{pulli}' ] delete )
  (set found_a_match)
 )
)

define remove_question_suffixes as (
 has_min_length
 unset found_a_match
 backwards (
  do (
   [ among('{vs_oo}' '{vs_ee}' '{vs_aa}') ] <- '{pulli}'
   (set found_a_match)
  )
 )
 do fix_endings
)

define remove_command_suffixes as (
 has_min_length
 unset found_a_match
 backwards (
  [ among('{pa}{vs_i}' '{va}{vs_i}') ] delete
  (set found_a_match) 
 )
)

define remove_um as (
 unset found_a_match
 has_min_length
 backwards ( [ '{vs_u}{ma}{pulli}' ] <- '{pulli}'
    (set found_a_match)
    )
 do fix_ending
)

define remove_common_word_endings as (
 // These are not suffixes actually but are 
 // some words that are attached to other words
 // but can be removed for stemming
 unset found_a_match
 has_min_length
 backwards (
  test ( [ '{vs_u}{tta}{nnna}{pulli}' or
     '{vs_i}{la}{pulli}{la}{vs_ai}' or
     '{vs_i}{tta}{ma}{pulli}' or 
     '{vs_i}{nnna}{pulli}{rra}{vs_i}' or
     '{vs_aa}{ka}{vs_i}' or 
     '{vs_aa}{ka}{vs_i}{ya}' or
     '{vs_e}{nnna}{pulli}{rra}{vs_u}' or 
     '{vs_u}{lla}{pulli}{lla}' or
     '{vs_u}{tta}{vs_ai}{ya}' or 
     '{vs_u}{tta}{vs_ai}' or
     '{vs_e}{nnna}{vs_u}{ma}{pulli}' or
     ('{la}{pulli}{la}' test (not among('{vs_aa}' '{vs_i}' '{vs_ii}' '{vs_e}' '{vs_ee}' '{vs_u}' '{vs_uu}' '{vs_ai}'))) or
     '{vs_e}{nnna}' or 
     '{vs_aa}{ka}{vs_i}' ] <- '{pulli}'
     (set found_a_match)
     )
  or
  test ( [ among('{pa}{tta}{vs_u}' 
     '{pa}{tta}{pulli}{tta}' 
     '{pa}{tta}{pulli}{tta}{vs_u}'
     '{pa}{tta}{pulli}{tta}{ta}{vs_u}' 
     '{pa}{tta}{pulli}{tta}{nna}' 
     '{ka}{vs_u}{ra}{vs_i}{ya}' 
     '{pa}{rra}{pulli}{rra}{vs_i}'
     '{va}{vs_i}{tta}{vs_u}'
     '{va}{vs_i}{tta}{pulli}{tta}{vs_u}'
     '{pa}{tta}{vs_i}{ta}{vs_aa}{nnna}'
     '{pa}{tta}{vs_i}' 
     '{ta}{vs_aa}{nnna}'
     '{vs_e}{la}{pulli}{la}{vs_aa}{ma}{pulli}')
    ] delete
    (set found_a_match)
    )
 )
 do fix_endings
)

define remove_vetrumai_urupukal as (
 unset found_a_match
 unset found_vetrumai_urupu
 has_min_length
 backwards (
  (
    test ( ['{nnna}{vs_ai}'] delete )
   or
    test ([ ( '{vs_i}{nnna}{vs_ai}' or
     '{vs_ai}' (test not among('{ka}' '{ca}' '{tta}' '{tha}' '{pa}' '{rra}'))) or
      ( '{vs_ai}' (test (among('{ka}' '{ca}' '{tta}' '{tha}' '{pa}' '{rra}') '{pulli}')))
    ] <- '{pulli}'
   
    )
   or
   test ( [ 
            '{vs_o}{tta}{vs_u}' or 
            '{vs_oo}{tta}{vs_u}' or
            '{vs_i}{la}{pulli}' or 
            '{vs_i}{rra}{pulli}' or
            ('{vs_i}{nnna}{pulli}' (test not '{ma}')) or
            '{vs_i}{nnna}{pulli}{rra}{vs_u}' or
            '{vs_i}{ra}{vs_u}{na}{pulli}{ta}{vs_u}' or
            '{va}{vs_i}{tta}' or 
            ($length >= 7 '{vs_i}{tta}{ma}{pulli}') or
            '{vs_aa}{la}{pulli}' or 
            '{vs_u}{tta}{vs_ai}' or
            '{vs_aa}{ma}{la}{pulli}' or
            ('{la}{pulli}' (test not among('{vs_aa}' '{vs_i}' '{vs_ii}' '{vs_e}' '{vs_ee}' '{vs_u}' '{vs_uu}' '{vs_ai}'))) or
            '{vs_u}{lla}{pulli}' 
           ] <- '{pulli}'
     )
   or
   test ( [ 
           '{ka}{nna}{pulli}' or 
           '{ma}{vs_u}{nnna}{pulli}' or
           '{ma}{vs_ee}{la}{pulli}' or 
           '{ma}{vs_ee}{rra}{pulli}' or
           '{ka}{vs_ii}{llla}{pulli}' or 
           '{pa}{vs_i}{nnna}{pulli}' or
           ('{ta}{vs_u}' (test not among('{vs_aa}' '{vs_i}' '{vs_ii}' '{vs_e}' '{vs_ee}' '{vs_u}' '{vs_uu}' '{vs_ai}'))) 
          ] delete
      )
   or
   test ([ '{vs_ii}' ] <- '{vs_i}')
  )
  (set found_a_match)
  (set found_vetrumai_urupu)
  do ( [ '{vs_i}{nnna}{pulli}' ] <- '{pulli}' )
 )
 do fix_endings
)

define remove_tense_suffixes as (
 set found_a_match
 repeat ( found_a_match (do remove_tense_suffix) )
)

define remove_tense_suffix as (
 unset found_a_match
 has_min_length
 backwards (
  do (
   test ( [among(
           '{ka}{vs_o}{nna}{pulli}{tta}{vs_i}{ra}{pulli}'
           '{pa}{tta}{vs_u}'
           )] delete
     (set found_a_match)
     )
   or
   test ( [
            '{ma}{vs_aa}{ra}{pulli}' or 
            '{ma}{vs_i}{nnna}{pulli}' or
            '{nnna}{nnna}{pulli}' or 
            '{nnna}{vs_aa}{nnna}{pulli}' or
            '{nnna}{vs_aa}{lla}{pulli}' or 
            '{nnna}{vs_aa}{ra}{pulli}' or
            ('{va}{nnna}{pulli}' test (not among('{a}' '{aa}' '{i}' '{ii}' '{u}' '{uu}' '{e}' '{ee}' '{ai}' '{o}' '{oo}' '{au}')) ) or
            '{nnna}{lla}{pulli}' or 
            '{va}{lla}{pulli}' or
            '{nnna}{ra}{pulli}' or 
            '{va}{ra}{pulli}' or
            '{nnna}' or '{pa}' or '{ka}' or '{ta}' or '{ya}' or
            '{pa}{nnna}{pulli}' or 
            '{pa}{lla}{pulli}' or
            '{pa}{ra}{pulli}' or
            ('{ta}{vs_u}' (test not among('{vs_aa}' '{vs_i}' '{vs_ii}' '{vs_e}' '{vs_ee}' '{vs_u}' '{vs_uu}' '{vs_ai}'))) or
            '{vs_i}{rra}{pulli}{rra}{vs_u}' or
            '{pa}{ma}{pulli}' or 
            '{nnna}{ma}{pulli}' or
            '{ta}{vs_u}{ma}{pulli}' or 
            '{rra}{vs_u}{ma}{pulli}' or
            '{ka}{vs_u}{ma}{pulli}' or 
            '{nnna}{vs_e}{nnna}{pulli}' or
            '{nnna}{vs_ai}' or 
            '{va}{vs_ai}'
       ] delete
       (set found_a_match)
       )
   or
   test ( [
           ('{vs_aa}{nnna}{pulli}' test (not '{ca}')) or
           '{vs_aa}{lla}{pulli}' or
           '{vs_aa}{ra}{pulli}' or
           '{vs_ee}{nnna}{pulli}' or 
           '{vs_aa}' or
           '{vs_aa}{ma}{pulli}' or
           '{vs_e}{ma}{pulli}' or
           '{vs_ee}{ma}{pulli}' or 
           '{vs_oo}{ma}{pulli}' or
           '{ka}{vs_u}{ma}{pulli}' or
           '{ta}{vs_u}{ma}{pulli}' or
           '{tta}{vs_u}{ma}{pulli}' or
           '{rra}{vs_u}{ma}{pulli}' or
           '{vs_aa}{ya}{pulli}' or
           '{nnna}{vs_e}{nnna}{pulli}' or
           '{nnna}{vs_i}{ra}{pulli}' or
           '{vs_ii}{ra}{pulli}' or
           '{vs_ii}{ya}{ra}{pulli}' 
          ] <- '{pulli}'
      (set found_a_match)
      )
   or
   test ( ([ '{ka}{vs_u}' or '{ta}{vs_u}' ) (test '{pulli}') ] delete
      (set found_a_match)
      )
  )
  do ([among(
              '{vs_aa}{na}{vs_i}{nnna}{pulli}{rra}'
              '{vs_aa}{na}{vs_i}{nnna}{pulli}{rra}{pulli}'
              '{ka}{vs_i}{nnna}{pulli}{rra}'
              '{ka}{vs_i}{nnna}{pulli}{rra}{pulli}'
              '{ka}{vs_i}{rra}'
              '{ka}{vs_i}{rra}{pulli}' 
            )] delete
    (set found_a_match)
    )
 )
 do fix_endings
)
